District of Columbia statutes.
38-751.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“DC-BAS” means the DC Benchmark System.

(2)

“DC-CAS” means the District of Columbia Comprehensive Assessment System examination.

(3)

“Feeder school group” means one or more schools serving students in grades 4 through 9. Feeder school groups shall be selected by the Mayor and may consist of any of the following:

(A)

An elementary school, middle school, and a high school in the same feeder pattern;

(B)

An education campus and high school in the same feeder pattern; or

(C)

One school that serves students in grades 4 through 9.

(4)

“Low-performing school” means a public school or public charter school in which fewer than 40% of students performed proficient or higher on the 2011 DC-CAS.

(5)

“Mid-high-performing school” means a public school or public charter school in which 40% or more of students performed proficient or higher on the 2011 DC-CAS.

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 102, 59 DCR 3642

History